North Carolina statutes. Chapter 59. Partnership.
Part 11. Miscellaneous.

§ 59-1101.
Construction and application.

This Article shall be so applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this Article among states enacting it.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Creation of North Carolina’s Limited Liability Corporation Act,” see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 179 (1997).

§ 59-1102.
Rules for cases not provided for in this Article.

In any case not provided for in this Article the provisions of Article 2 of this Chapter govern.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2.

§ 59-1103.
Severability.

If any provision of this Article or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the Article which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this Article are severable.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2.

§ 59-1104.
Effective date and repeal.

Except as set forth below, the effective date of this Article is October 1, 1986, and Article 1 of Chapter 59 of the North Carolina General Statutes is hereby repealed subject to the following:

G.S. 59-501

, 59-502, and 59-608 shall apply only to contributions and distributions made after the effective date;

G.S. 59-704

applies only to assignments made after the effective date;

G.S. 59-804

shall not be construed so as to change the priority of creditors for transactions entered into prior to the effective date;

Unless agreed otherwise by the partners, the applicable provisions of existing law governing allocation of profits and losses (rather than the provisions of

G.S. 59-503

), distribution to a withdrawing partner (rather than the provisions of

G.S. 59-604

), and the distribution of assets upon the winding up of a limited partnership (rather than the provisions of

G.S. 59-804

) shall govern limited partnerships formed before the effective date of this Article herein.[;]

The repeal of any prior statutory provision by this Article shall not impair, or otherwise affect, the organization or continued existence of a limited partnership existing at the effective date of this Article, nor shall the repeal by this Article of any such prior provision be construed so as to impair any contract or to affect any right accrued prior to the effective date of this Article; but such limited partnerships shall be subject to the procedural and other requirements of this Article except as otherwise specified in G.S. 59-1104(a). Provided, that failure to comply with the requirements of this Article by such limited partnerships shall not cause loss of limited liability.

Any foreign limited partnership formed under the laws of another jurisdiction doing business in this State prior to the effective date shall within two years thereafter comply with Part 9 of Article 5 of Chapter 59.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 1987, c. 531, ss. 9, 10.

§ 59-1105.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-387, s. 148, effective January 1, 2002.

§ 59-1106.
Filing, service, and copying fees.

The Secretary of State shall collect the following fees when the documents described in this subsection are delivered to the Secretary of State for filing:

Click to view

The Secretary of State shall collect a fee of ten dollars ($10.00) each time process is served on the Secretary under this Article. The party to a proceeding causing service of process is entitled to recover this fee as costs if the party prevails in the proceeding.

The Secretary of State shall collect the following fees for copying, comparing, and certifying a copy of any filed document relating to a domestic or foreign limited partnership:

One dollar ($1.00) a page for copying or comparing a copy to the original; and

Fifteen dollars ($15.00) for a paper certificate.

Ten dollars ($10.00) for an electronic certificate.

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-387, s. 171(b), effective January 1, 2002.

Document Fee (1) Certificate of limited partnership which does not include an application for registration as a limited liability limited partnership $50.00 (2) Certificate of limited partnership which includes an applica- tion for registration as a limited liability limited partnership 125.00 (3) Certificate of amendment 25.00 (4) Certificate of cancellation 25.00 (5) Application for reservation of name 10.00 (6) Notice of transfer of reserved name 10.00 (7) Application for registration of name 10.00 (8) Application for renewal of registration name 10.00 (9) Limited partnership’s or foreign limited partnership’s state- ment of change of registered agent or registered office or both 5.00 (10) Agent’s statement of change of registered office for each affected partnership 5.00 (11) Agent’s statement of resignation No Fee (12) Designation of registered agent or registered office or both 5.00 (13) Application for registration as foreign limited partnership 50.00 (14) Certificate of amendment of registration as foreign limited partnership 25.00 (15) Cancellation of registration as foreign limited partnership 25.00 (16) Application for certificate of withdrawal by reason of merger, consolidation, or conversion 10.00 (17) Articles of merger 50.00 (18) Articles of conversion (other than articles of conversion included as part of another document) (19) Application for registration as a limited liability limited partnership (other than an application included in the certificate of limited partnership) 125.00 (20) Certificate of amendment of registration as a limited liabil- ity limited partnership 25.00 (21) Certificate of cancellation of registration as a limited liabil- ity limited partnership 25.00 (22) Annual report for a limited liability limited partnership 200.00 (23) Any other document required or permitted to be filed under this Article 10.00

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 1991, c. 574, s. 3; 1995, c. 539, s. 37; 1997-485, s. 13; 2001-358, ss. 10(f), 37; 2001-387, ss. 149, 171(a), 171(b), 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6; 2002-126, s. 29A.31.

§ 59-1107.
Income taxation.

A limited partnership, a foreign limited partnership authorized to transact business in this State, and a partner of one of these partnerships are subject to taxation under Article 4 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes in accordance with their classification for federal income tax purposes. Accordingly, if a limited partnership or a foreign limited partnership authorized to transact business in this State is classified for federal income tax purposes as a C corporation as defined in G.S. 105-131(b)(2) or an S corporation as defined in G.S. 105-131(b)(8), the partnership and its partners are subject to tax under Article 4 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes to the same extent as a C corporation or an S corporation, as the case may be, and its shareholders. If a limited partnership or a foreign limited partnership authorized to transact business in this State is classified for federal income tax purposes as a partnership, the partnership and its partners are subject to tax under Article 4 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes accordingly. If a limited partnership or a foreign limited partnership authorized to transact business in this State is classified for federal income tax purposes as other than a corporation or a partnership, the partnership and its partners are subject to tax under Article 4 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes in a manner consistent with that classification. This section does not require a limited partnership or a foreign limited partnership to obtain an administrative ruling from the Internal Revenue Service on its classification under the Internal Revenue Code.

History.

2001-387, s. 150.